Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 8
Retirement Of Judges And Court Employees

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
6341, provided: “Effect of transfer on retirement system membership and health insurance plan participation.

“(a)

As used in this section, ‘retirement system’ means:

“(1)

The Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, established by the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act, § 24-7-201 et seq.;

“(2)

The Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System, established by § 24-5-103;

“(3)

The Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, established by § 24-4-103;

“(4)

The State Police Retirement System, established by § 24-6-203;

“(5)

The Arkansas Judicial Retirement System, established by § 24-8-201 et seq.;

“(6)

An alternate retirement plan for:

“(A)

A college, university, or the Department of Higher Education provided for under § 24-7-801 et seq.; and

“(B)

A vocational-technical school or the Department of Career Education provided for under § 24-7-901 et seq.;

“(7)

The Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System provided for under § 24-10-101 et seq.; and

“(8)

A firemen's relief and pension fund or a policemen's pension and relief fund provided for under § 24-11-101 et seq.

“(b)

If this act results in an employee who is a current member of a retirement system prior to the effective date of this act being transferred to or affiliated with a cabinet-level department that is covered by a different retirement system than his or her previous state entity, the employee may, within one hundred eighty (180) days of the effective date of this act by written election and notice to the new employer and affected retirement system, make a one-time choice to:

“(1)

Remain in his or her same retirement system prior to the effective date of this act, under the same conditions then provided by law or as may later be provided by law; or

“(2)

Become a member of the retirement system of the cabinet-level department to which the employee is transferred to or affiliated with under this act, under the same conditions for a reciprocal member to be transferred as an active member to a reciprocal system as currently provided by law under the system to which the reciprocal member is transferred.

“(c)

If this act results in an employee being transferred to or affiliated with a cabinet-level department that is covered by a different health insurance plan than his or her previous state entity, the employee may, within one hundred eighty (180) days of the effective date of this act, make a one-time choice between:

“(1)

Continuing to participate in his or her health insurance plan prior to the effective date of this act, under the same conditions then provided by law or as may later be provided by law; or

“(2)

Participating in the health insurance plan of the cabinet-level department to which the employee is transferred to or affiliated with under this act, under the same conditions then provided by law or as may later be provided by law.

“(d)(1)(A)

A retirement system may issue policies establishing the procedure for an employee to exercise benefit options under subsection (b) of this section.

“(B)

The State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Board may issue policies establishing the procedure for an employee to exercise benefit options under subsection (c) of this section.

“(2)

A policy under subdivision (d)(1) of this section is not a rule under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.”

Subchapter 1
— General Provisions

Effective Dates.

Acts 2001, No. 626, § 3: Mar. 9, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that for the effective administration of this act and to avoid undue harm to the members and benefit recipients of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System and the Tier Two Actual Judicial Service Benefit Plan, this act should become effective immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

24-8-101. Previously retired justice.

Any judge or justice under the age of seventy (70) who is receiving retirement benefits under § 24-8-201 et seq. or § 24-8-701 et seq., who is elected or appointed to any judicial office in this state, and who foregoes receipt of retirement benefits while serving in the judicial office shall be entitled to resume receiving his or her previous retirement benefits upon termination of the subsequent service.

If at the time of the initial retirement the judge or justice was entitled to the benefits of the escalator clause provided in § 24-8-218(c)(1) or postretirement benefits provided in § 24-8-223 or § 24-8-717, the judge or justice and the judge's or justice's survivors shall again be entitled to the benefits upon the termination of any such subsequent judicial service.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 626, § 1.

Subchapter 2
— Arkansas Judicial Retirement System

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this subchapter” in §§ 24-8-201 — 24-8-207 and 24-8-209 — 24-8-220 may not apply to §§ 24-8-222 — 24-8-228 which were enacted subsequently.

Ark. Const., Am. 80, § 19(A)(2) provided that all circuit, chancery, and circuit-chancery judges “in office at the time this amendment takes effect shall continue in office as Circuit judges . . .” Amendment 80 further provided in § 19(B)(1) that the circuit courts would “assume the jurisdiction of Circuit, Chancery, Probate and Juvenile Courts.” Amendment 80 also provides that many of the lower courts will combine into district courts. The first portion of Amendment 80, § 19(B)(2) states: “District Courts shall have the jurisdiction vested in Municipal Courts, Corporation Courts, Police Courts, Justice of the Peace Courts, and Courts of Common Pleas at the time this Amendment takes effect. District Courts shall assume the jurisdiction of these courts of limited jurisdiction and other jurisdiction conferred in this Amendment on January 1, 2005.”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1953, No. 365, § 11: Approved Mar. 28, 1953. Emergency clause provided: “Because this Act is a compact or agreement as to those who may certify for benefits under its provisions, and because the state's public policy is to foster the independence, dignity, and integrity of the judiciary, it is found that the public peace, health and safety requires its immediate availability; therefore an emergency is declared and all of its provisions shall become effective from and after its passage.”

Acts 1965, No. 139, § 10: Mar. 2, 1965. Emergency clause provided: “Because of the present economic conditions making it extremely difficult to attract and retain highly capable members of the legal profession as members of the state judiciary, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1967, No. 249, § 3: Approved Mar. 10, 1967. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that it is becoming increasingly difficult to attract well-trained members of the Arkansas bar to the bench; that liberal retirement benefits are conducive to attracting capable judges to serve upon the courts of this State; and, that in order to reward the judges for their loyal service and to attract talented men to serve, it is necessary that this Act become effective immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1971, No. 358, § 4: Mar. 22, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the State of Arkansas has established various retirement plans designed to provide retirement security for public officials and employees, and that under certain circumstances elected officials who have rendered long service as a prosecuting attorney are, upon being elected to a judicial office covered by the Judicial Retirement System, denied an opportunity to obtain full credited service in the Judicial Retirement System for such former service as an elected prosecuting attorney; that service as an elected prosecuting attorney for the minimum period of years as provided in this Act, constitutes a substantial contribution to the judicial process of this State and should be given equal treatment upon application for credited services for said years of service in the Judicial Retirement System upon election by such person to the judgeship as a circuit or chancery judge, or as a justice of the supreme court; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to establish provisions for obtaining such retirement benefits and to enable any person so elected to a judicial office to gain the benefits of retirement protection maintained by law. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1973, No. 192, § 4: Mar. 2, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the State of Arkansas has established various retirement plans designed to provide retirement security for public officials and employees, and that under certain circumstances elected officials who have rendered service as a prosecuting attorney are, upon being elected to a judicial office covered by the Judicial Retirement System, denied an opportunity to obtain full credited service in the Judicial Retirement System for such former service as an elected prosecuting attorney; that service as an elected prosecuting attorney for the minimum period of years as provided in this Act, constitute a substantial contribution to the judicial process of this State and should be given equal treatment upon application for credited services for said years of service in the Judicial Retirement System upon election by such person to the judgeship as a circuit or chancery judge, or as a justice of the Supreme Court; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to establish provisions for obtaining such retirement benefits and to enable any person so elected to a judicial office to gain the benefits of retirement protection maintained by law. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1973, No. 407, § 6: Mar. 21, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that it is becoming increasingly difficult to attract well-trained members of the Arkansas Bar to the Bench and that liberal retirement benefits are conducive to attracting capable judges to serve upon the courts of this State; and, that in order to reward the judges for their loyal service and to attract talented men to serve, it is necessary that this Act become effective immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 333, § 4: Mar. 7, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that it is becoming increasingly difficult to attract well-trained members of the Arkansas Bar to the bench and that liberal retirement benefits are conducive to attracting capable judges to serve upon the courts of this state; and, that in order to reward the judges for their loyal service and to attract talented men to serve, it is necessary that this Act become effective immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 484, § 9: Mar. 19, 1975. Emergency clauses provided: “It is hereby found and determined that some surviving unremarried widows of deceased Supreme Court and Circuit and Chancery Court Judges now have no opportunity to receive survivor benefits under said system; that it is in the best interest of the citizens of this State that legislation be enacted whereby such surviving widows may qualify for benefits; and this Act is designed to accomplish this purpose and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 636, § 4: Mar. 28, 1979. Emergency clauses provided: “It is hereby found and determined that some surviving unremarried widows of deceased Supreme Court and Circuit and Chancery Court Judges now have no opportunity to receive survivor benefits under said system; that it is in the best interest of the citizens of this State that legislation be enacted whereby such surviving widows may qualify for benefits; and this Act is designed to accomplish this purpose and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 825, § 3: Mar. 28, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present law relating to judicial retirement benefits is not clear with respect to the salary upon which retirement benefits and survivors' benefits are to be computed in those cases where, after retirement under the System, a judge is subsequently elected or appointed to a judical office for which the compensation is greater than the compensation for the judicial office held by such judge at the time of his initial retirement; that this Act is designed to clarify the law in this respect and to assure that the retirement benefits and survivor benefits under the Judicial Retirement System will be based on the salary provided for the judicial office last held by the retirant, if the compensation for that office is greater than the compensation received by the judge at the time of his initial retirement. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 158, § 3: Feb. 14, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that a number of retired judges are willing to perform temporary duty, but are hesitant due to uncertainty as to the effect of such temporary service upon their retirement benefits; and that this Act is immediately necessary to eliminate such uncertainty. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 616, § 6: Emergency clause failed to pass. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that this Act should go into effect July 1, 1983 in order to provide for the efficient operation of the Chancery; that unless this emergency clause is adopted the Act may not be effective until after July 1, 1983. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be effective from and after July 1, 1983.”

Acts 1983, No. 922, § 18: July 1, 1983, except § 3, which is effective Apr. 7, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Fourth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1983 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1983 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs; and that the immediate effectiveness of Section 3 of this Act is essential to maintaining the fiscal integrity of the Judges Retirement Fund which would otherwise work irreparable harm upon the provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect as follows: Section 3 of this Act shall be effective immediately upon passage and approval of this Act; and all other Sections and provisions of this Act shall be effective from and after July 1, 1983.”

Acts 1987, No. 897, § 3: Apr. 13, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present law establishing the method whereby a municipal judge may transfer credited service to the Judicial Retirement System is inadequate; that the present law results in inequity; and that the inequity will continue until this Act becomes effective. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 407, § 5: Mar. 9, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that retired judges of the Judicial Retirement System are currently serving in active judicial office in this state by reason of election or appointment, and that in order to make clear and certain the rights of such judges and their survivors as to the retirement benefits and survivors' benefits to be received from the Judicial Retirement System after such judge's active judicial service is terminated, it is necessary that this act become effective immediately. Therefore an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 1355, § 5: Became law without Governor's signature. Noted Apr. 17, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the service rendered by circuit judges to the citizens and the State of Arkansas has not been adequately rewarded by the compensation provided to them, that certain circuit judges who chose not to retire at the mandatory retirement age will even be stripped of their retirement benefits; that this will create an inequity for all those ineligible judges and justices, and that the effective and efficient administration of justice for state government demands that this inequity be corrected immediately. Therefore, in order to correct this inequity, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 129, § 5: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “Emergency. It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the redetermination of benefits provision of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System needs clarification and that the effective administration of the system will be aided by implementing these changes at the beginning of the State's fiscal year. Therefore, in order to promote sound administration in State government, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall become effective July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1997, No. 236, § 5: Feb. 21, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “Emergency. It is hereby found and deteremined by the Eighty-First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the current language in the Federal Internal Revenue Code makes it imperative that changes be made in laws of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System regarding employee contributions for income tax treatment purposes to save the member-judges' money; that administrative efficiency dictates those changes be made at the beginning of the calendar year on January 1st; and that these changes are essential to protect the financial interest of the membership of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System. Therefore, in order to protect the financial interest of the menbers of the System, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effectve on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 388, § 6: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly, that historically the Judicial Retirement System has recomputed retirement benefits on July 1 of each year to reflect a cost of living increase; that this act modifies the cost of living increase; and that unless this emergency clause is adopted, this act will not go into effect on July 1 of this year; and that unless this emergency clause is adopted, this act will not be effective until July 1 of the succeeding year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 1325, § 14: July 1, 1999, except §§ 2 and 3 which are effective July 30, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that Act 311 of 1999 changes the amount of additional monthly benefits in the State Highway Employees' Retirement System and they are necessary for the continued financial stability of the current retirees, that clarifications are needed in order to make Act 311 take effect in an orderly fashion, that these changes in Act 311 must then take effect at the same time Act 311 becomes effective, and that it is necessary to implement the changes in benefits at the beginning of the current fiscal year. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act, except for Sections 2 and 3, being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 2001, No. 763, § 8: July 1, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act should be effective at a time certain which is consistent with the actuarial evaluations of the Judicial Retirement System; that the failure of the act to be effective at a time certain will disrupt the proper administration of the Judicial Retirement System; that the Judicial Retirement System utilizes the state fiscal year as its accounting year for actuarial purposes; that without this emergency clause this act may not become effective until after July 1, 2001. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2009, No. 744, § 3: July 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act makes revisions to benefits received by certain members of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System and that the ideal time to make revisions to the system is at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective July 1, 2009.”

24-8-201. Public policy.

It is declared to be the state's public policy that chancery and circuit court judges and justices of the Supreme Court may retire or be retired when that course appears to be in the best interest of the official concerned and for the public welfare. Factors suggesting the desirability of retirement are physical disability, advanced age, or other infirmities calculated to materially impair usefulness. In addition, it is the public policy of the state to provide sufficient retirement and survivors' benefits for the chancery and circuit court judges and justices of the Supreme Court of the state to attract and retain highly capable members of the legal profession for service in the state judiciary.

History.

Acts 1953, No. 365, § 1; 1965, No. 139, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 22-901.

24-8-202. Applicability.

The provisions of this act shall not be retroactive but shall extend benefits from the time of its passage. It shall also apply to judges now living who retired prior to the passage of this act and to the survivors of those judges.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 139, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 22-912.

Publisher's Notes.

In reference to the term, “passage of this act”, Acts 1965, No. 139, was signed by the Governor and took effect on March 2, 1965.

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1965, No. 139, codified as §§ 24-8-201, 24-8-202, 24-8-215, 24-8-217, 24-8-218, 24-8-220.

24-8-203. Board of trustees.

The administration and control of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System shall be vested in a board known as the “Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System”.

The members of the board shall consist of five (5) persons appointed by the Arkansas Judicial Council.

The members shall serve at the pleasure of the council.

One (1) of the members shall be elected by the board to serve as chair.

The duties of the board shall be:

To make all rules necessary and proper for carrying out the provisions of this section;

To provide administrative direction and control of the executive director and staff as may from time to time be required;

To appoint an actuary, or firm of actuaries, to be a technical advisor to the board on matters regarding the operation of the system on an actuarial basis. The actuary shall perform such duties as are required by him or her under this subdivision (c)(3) and as are from time to time required by the board;

To appoint professional investment counsel to be the board's investment advisor or money manager;

To serve without pay but may receive expense reimbursement in accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq.; and

To do any and all things necessary for the proper execution of this section.

The board shall meet at least quarterly and at other times as necessary at the call of the chair.

History.

Acts 1953, No. 365, § 3; 1981, No. 604, § 1; 1985, No. 235, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 22-903; Acts 1995, No. 1282, § 1; 1997, No. 240, § 1; 1997, No. 250, § 232; 2019, No. 315, § 2893.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (c)(1).

24-8-204. Administration.

The executive director and administrative staff of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall be the executive director and administrative staff of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System.

All administrative records of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System shall be maintained within the administrative offices of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System shall continue to exercise the powers, functions, and duties previously exercised.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to diminish or otherwise alter the powers, functions, and duties of the board.

All costs of administering the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System shall be paid from the Judges Retirement Fund, but no payment for such expenses shall be made unless authorized by the board.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 922, §§ 4, 6, 11; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 22-958, 22-959, 22-963.

24-8-205. Trust fund.

In addition to the Judges Retirement Fund in the State Treasury, a bank trust fund or funds may be established and maintained in a federally insured depository institution designated by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System.

The board shall be the trustees of the funds, subject to the other provisions of this section, and may employ professional investment counsel in either an advisory capacity only or as a money manager with authority to execute transactions.

The funds of the system shall be invested and reinvested in accordance with the following procedure:

From time to time, the board shall formulate the policy to be followed in future investment activity;

If the board employs investment counsel with authority to execute transactions, the counsel or money manager shall have full power to hold, purchase, sell, assign, transfer, or dispose of any of the moneys or investments of the system pursuant to the provisions of this section and in accordance with the current investment policy filed with the board;

At least semiannually, the investment counsel shall file with the board a written report setting forth, for the period since its last report, all investments purchased and sold, all receipts and disbursements, and any other transactions concerning system moneys;

At each regular meeting, the board shall examine each written report received from the investment counsel since the last regular meeting;

Anything in this section to the contrary notwithstanding, from time to time the board may direct a specific investment activity and shall be fully responsible for the direction; and

Anything in this section to the contrary notwithstanding, investment activity shall be subject to the terms, conditions, limitations, and restrictions imposed by law upon state public employee retirement plans in the making and disposing of their investments.

A decision on whether to invest, not invest, or withdraw from investment the funds of the system shall not be based on a consideration that the location of the investment, fund, company, or any other type of investment vehicle is in the State of Israel.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 922, § 7; 1985, No. 1008, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 22-960; Acts 2017, No. 769, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment added (d).

24-8-206. Annual actuarial valuation.

An actuarial valuation shall be made annually to determine how well the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System is meeting the financial objectives applicable to all state-supported retirement systems.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 922, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 22-962.

24-8-207. Membership generally — Prior service credit.

All chancery judges, circuit judges, judges of the Court of Appeals and justices of the Supreme Court, whether elected or appointed to office, shall participate in the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System.

Any active member who did not become a member at the time of his or her initial election or appointment may acquire prior service credit by paying into the system all contributions, together with interest, that would have been paid if he or she had been a member of the system from the time he or she took office until he or she became enrolled.

History.

Acts 1953, No. 365, § 5; 1985, No. 232, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 22-905.

24-8-208. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning membership of the Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts, was repealed by Acts 1993, No. 944, § 2. The section was derived from Acts 1965, No. 496, § 2; 1971, No. 599, § 1; 1973, No. 237, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 22-143. For present law, see § 24-4-740.

24-8-209. Contributions — Members — Refund.

The contribution of each member of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System shall be six percent (6%) of each member's annual salary.

In the event a judge ceases to be a member prior to qualifying for retirement benefits, he or she shall be entitled to a refund of all contributions paid by him or her into the system.

For purposes of deferring federal and state income tax and pursuant to the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 414 (h)(2), as adopted by § 26-51-414, the state shall pick up the members' contributions to the judicial retirement fund as required by this section and payable on or after January 1, 1997.

Member contributions picked up by the state shall be paid from the same source of funds used for the payment of salary to a member. A deduction shall be made from each member's salary, equal to the amount of the member's contribution picked up by the employer. For all other purposes, member contributions picked up by the state shall be considered member contributions.

The provisions of subdivisions (c)(1) and (2) of this section providing for the state to pay the member's contributions for tax deferral under the Internal Revenue Code, § 26-51-414(h), shall be effective from and retroactive to January 1, 1997.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 616, § 5; 1985, No. 233, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 22-908.1; Acts 1997, No. 236, § 1.

24-8-210. Contributions — State.

The state, as employer, shall make contributions to the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System of twelve percent (12%) of the active member payroll.

The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State is authorized and directed to make annual transfers on each July 1 to the Judges Retirement Fund from the Constitutional Officers Fund and the State Central Services Fund in an amount determined by computing the dollar amount required based on the actuarially determined employer rate in the most recent annual actuarial valuation and subtracting from that amount the statutory contribution amount specified in subsection (a) of this section, and further, reduced by the amount of the court cost revenue transferred to the Judges Retirement Fund from the State Administration of Justice Fund in accordance with § 16-10-310.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 922, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 22-961; Acts 2001, No. 763, § 1.

Effective Dates.

Acts 2001, No. 763, § 6, provided: “The revised benefits which are adopted pursuant to this act shall be extended to current and future members of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System and to current retired members and current survivor annuitants of the system.”

24-8-211. Contributions — Cessation upon retirement.

When a judge is certified as eligible for retirement, no further contribution shall be required of the judge.

Upon the written notice of election by the member of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System, a judge with at least twenty (20) years of judicial service may continue or recommence payment of the six-percent (6%) contribution into the system to accrue the maximum retirement benefit provided under § 24-8-218.

History.

Acts 1953, No. 365, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 22-909; Acts 2009, No. 744, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment added (b), and made a minor stylistic change.

24-8-212. Credited service — Transfer of service as municipal judge.

Any person who shall have served as a municipal judge in any municipal court in this state and who holds credited service therefor in any retirement system or retirement fund is authorized to transfer his or her credited services in the retirement system or fund to the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System by:

Notifying, in writing, the administrative body of each retirement plan of his or her intention to transfer his or her tenure;

Authorizing the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System or appropriate administrative body of his or her retirement system to transfer to the system any sums of money paid for his or her retirement to the retirement fund or system by the municipal judge and, at the option of the city council or board of directors, to transfer to the system the court costs collected during his or her tenure as municipal judge; and

Paying into the system an amount of money he or she would have paid into the system for an equal amount of tenure as a judge of the court to which he or she has been elected, less the amount of money from his or her present retirement system as authorized in this section.

Upon transferring the credited service from his or her present retirement fund or system, the person shall be given credited service in the system for an equal number of years of credited service for which he or she has qualified under any other plan or system to which he or she has belonged by reason of his or her service as municipal judge.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 333, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 22-904.2; Acts 1987, No. 897, § 1.